New Mexico, session 2026, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 34-6-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1968, Chapter 69, Section 7, as amended) is amended to read: "34-6-4. JUDGES--FIRST JUDICIAL DISTRICT.--There shall be [ten] eleven district judges in the first judicial district." SECTION 2. Section 34-6-5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1968, Chapter 69, Section 8, as amended) is amended to read: "34-6-5. JUDGES--SECOND JUDICIAL DISTRICT.--There shall be [thirty] thirty-one district judges in the second judicial district." SECTION 3. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public peace, health and safety that this act take effect immediately.